Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 3. Standby Conservatorships

§ 3-3-301.
Voluntary petition for appointment of conservator; standby basis.

Any adult who is of sound mind may execute a petition for the voluntary appointment of a conservator of his property upon the express condition that the petition shall be acted upon by the court only upon the occurrence of a specified event or on the existence of a described condition of the mental or physical health of the petitioner. The occurrence of the specified event or the existence of the described condition shall be established in the manner directed in the petition.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-302.
Petition may nominate conservator.

The petition may nominate a person for appointment to serve as conservator, and may request that the appointment be made without bond, or with bond of a certain stated sum. When appointing the conservator the court shall give due regard to the nomination and other requests and recommendations contained in the petition.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-303.
Deposit of petition.

The petition may be deposited with any person, firm, bank or trust company selected by the petitioner.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-304.
Revocation of petition.

Any time before the appointment of a conservator, the petition may be revoked by the petitioner if he is of sound mind. Revocation shall be accomplished by the destruction of the petition by the petitioner or by an instrument of revocation acknowledged by the petitioner and delivered to the depository.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-305.
Filing petition upon occurrence of conditions.

Any time after the deposit of the petition and before its revocation, it may be brought on for hearing upon the filing of a statement verified by the person having possession of the petition showing that the event or the condition provided for in the petition has occurred. The petition and the verified statement shall be filed with the clerk of court of the county in which the person who executed the petition then resides.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-306.
Time of appointment of conservator.

At the time the verified statement is filed, the court may appoint the conservator nominated in the petition or may set the petition for hearing on notice prescribed by the court.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.